errortag-src/noun-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                     North Sámi noun lexicon                                !
! ========================================================================== !

! This is a lexicon to be used with aspell spell checker only.
! It is at the moment not in use. Remove the string "!aSPell: " if you want to use it.
! Target is to use as many sublexicons as possible with as many variables
! as possible to create aspell affix file.
!aSPell: LEXICON AspellAffix
!aSPell: 
!aSPell: !BISYLLABIC
!aSPell: ! GOAHTI lexicon has consonant gradation and dipthtong simplification
!aSPell: ! Cases: -i, -á, -u, -a, -e, and -o endings
!aSPell: ! Obsolete because GOAHTI has same endings as GADDI ??
!aSPell: !buohkki GOAHTI-IU ;
!aSPell: !buohkká GOAHTI ;
!aSPell: !duohkku GOAHTI-IU ;
!aSPell: !fuohkka GOAHTI ;
!aSPell: !fuohkke GOAHTI ;
!aSPell: !buohkko GOAHTI ;
!aSPell: ! GADDI lexicon has comparative forms
!aSPell: ! Cases: -i, -á, -u, -a, -e, and -o endings
!aSPell: buohkki GADDI ;
!aSPell: cuohkká GADDI ;
!aSPell: duohkku GADDI ;
!aSPell: fuohkka GADDI ;
!aSPell: guohkke GADDI ;
!aSPell: huohkko GADDI ;
!aSPell: ! IIJA non-gradating w/ a-ill
!aSPell: guohkkinymiija IIJA ; ! other case endings?
!aSPell: ! STAHTA non-gradating w/ a/i-ill/
!aSPell: buohkkistáhta STAHTA ;
!aSPell: 
!aSPell: !TRISYLLABIC
!aSPell: ! SEAMU gradating trisyllabic
!aSPell: ! Cases: -i, -a, and -u endings
!aSPell: jea0lu:jeallum8 SEAMU ;
!aSPell: kuo0mi:kuopmán8 SEAMU ;
!aSPell: muo0mu:muopmum8 SEAMU ;
!aSPell: nea0na:neatnag8 SEAMU ;
!aSPell: ! MALIS gradating w/ consonant endings
!aSPell: ! Cases: -is, -uš, and -ir endings
!aSPell: buoh0pis:buoh'pis MALIS ;
!aSPell: duoh0puš:duoh'puš MALIS ;
!aSPell: goah0pir:goah'pir MALIS ;
!aSPell: ! Cases: -is, -uš, and -ir endings
!aSPell: 
!aSPell: !CONTRACTED
!aSPell: ! SUOLU contracted
!aSPell: ! Cases: -u ending only?
!aSPell: suo00zu:suohccu SUOLU ;
!aSPell: ! FALIS contracted
!aSPell: ! Cases: -is only?
!aSPell: fálggis:fál'gis FALIS ;
!aSPell: 
!aSPell: !MISC
!aSPell: ! LEXDIMINC diminutives
!aSPell: beanáš:beanáž LEXDIMINC ;
!aSPell: 
!aSPell: ! Add more and correct these.

! LEXICON GuessNoun
! GOAHTI ;
! STAHTA ;
! IIJA ;
! ACCRA ;
! MATTAR ;
! MALIS ;
! BEANA ;
! SEAMU ;
! NIILLAS ;
! BOAZU ;
! SUOLU ;
! SATTU ;
! GISTTA ;-
! FALIS ;
! LASIS ;
! GADDI ;
! !OLLUVUOHTA ;
! MAGASH ;
! EGEZHAGAT ;
! GARGIA ;
! BUFFALO ;

LEXICON NounSecond
! some stray affixes, look at these
! Trying them without the initial hyphen
bea0lis+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:beallis LASIS ;
čor0gi+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:čor'gi GOAHTI-IU ;
giel+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:giel At ;
miese#beas0ka+CmpN/Last:miese#beas'ka GOAHTI ;
nammasaš+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:nammas AHKASAS ;
niehkki+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only:niehkki AIGI ;
sahán+CmpN/Last+CmpN/Only:sahám BOAHTIN ;
sis#muotkun:sis#muotkum BOAHTIN ;
!čiegahas:čiegahass JOHTOLAT ; !Especially with numerals, moved to LEXICON SAS

! Yes, this is what they used to look like.
! We remove these obsolete ones if we like the hyphenless ones.
!-bea0lis:-beallis LASIS ;
!-čor0gi:-čor'gi GOAHTI-IU ;
!-giel At ;
!-miese#beas0ka:-miese#beas'ka GOAHTI ;
!-nammasaš:-nammasažž JOHTOLAT ;
!-niehkki:-niehkki AIGI ;
!-sahán:-sahám BOAHTIN ; !+CmpN/Sg +CmpN/SgLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
!-sis#muotkun:-sis#muotkum BOAHTIN ; !+CmpN/Sg +CmpN/SgLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft

!LEXICON NOUNONLYAFTERNUMBER
!čiegahas:čiegahass JOHTOLAT ;

!LEXICON NOUNALSOAFTERNUMBER
!# ;

! bahá: Seamma subst ferte lea guokte geardde. Čiegahas ii gávdno okto.
! molssueaktu: Vqldit miellahtutut eret NounRoot:as, ja geavahit 121.
